test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-odd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable propers belonging to LONDON-plc, PLACE-DIM-plc, DUORTNUS-plc, RANES-plc, CAVKKUS-plc, ANAR-mal, BALAK-plc, SARAK-plc, GUOLBBA-plc, ADJAGAT-plc, EATNAMAT-plc, ANGELIT-org

Tests:

  Proper - Siglufjörđur: # LONDON-plc
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Siglufjörđur
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: [Siglufjörđura, Siglufjörđur]
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Siglufjörđurii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Siglufjörđuris
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: siglufjörđurlažžii
    Siglufjörđur+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: siglufjörđurlaččaid

  Proper - Silbabološ: # PLACE-DIM-plc
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Silbabološ
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Silbaboloža
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Silbaboložii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Silbaboložis
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: silbaboložlažžii
    Silbabološ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: silbaboložlaččaid


  Proper - Vállášvuomus: # DUORTNUS-plc
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Vállášvuomus
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Vállášvupmosa
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Vállášvupmosii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Vállášvupmosis
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: vállášvuomuslažžii
    Vállášvuomus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: vállášvuomuslaččaid

  Proper - Ráneš: # RANES-plc
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Ráneš
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Rátnáha
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Rátnáhii
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Rátnáhis
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: ránešlažžii
    Ráneš+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: ránešlaččaid

  Proper - Čávkkus: # CAVKKUS-plc
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Čávkkus
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Čávkoha
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Čávkohii
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Čávkohis
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: čávkkuslažžii
    Čávkkus+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: čávkkuslaččaid

  Proper - Ánddir: # ANAR-mal
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ánddir
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ánddira
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánddirii
    Ánddir+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Loc: Ánddiris

  Proper - Guorpak: # BALAK-plc
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Guorpak
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Guorpaga
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Guorpagii
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Guorpagis
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: guorpaklažžii
    Guorpak+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: guorpaklaččaid

  Proper - Harrok: # SARAK-plc
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Harrok
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Harroha
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Harrohii
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Harrohis
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: harroklažžii
    Harrok+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: harroklaččaid

  Proper - Kruvnnasavu: # GUOLBBA-plc
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Kruvnnasavu
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Kruvnnasavvona
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Kruvnnasavvonii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Loc: Kruvnnasavvonis
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: kruvnnasavulažžii
    Kruvnnasavu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: kruvnnasavulaččaid

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # ADJAGAT-plc
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Skoahppaádjagat
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Skoahppaádjagiid
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Skoahppaádjagiidda
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Loc: Skoahppaádjagiin
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: skoahppaájalažžii
    Skoahppaádjagat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: skoahppaájalaččaid

  Proper - Dálvasnjaŋgguhat: # EATNAMAT-plc
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Dálvasnjaŋgguhat
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiid
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiidda
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Loc: Dálvasnjaŋgguhiin
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Ill: dálvasnjaŋggutlažžii
    Dálvasnjaŋgguhat+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/laš+A+Pl+Acc: dálvasnjaŋggutlaččaid

  Proper - Angelit: # ANGELIT-org
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Angelit
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Gen: Angeliid
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Angeliidda
    Angelit+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Loc: Angeliin
